Florida, session 2026, HB117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 515.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
515.27 Residential swimming pool safety feature options;
penalties.—
(1) In order to pass final inspection and receive a
certificate of completion, a residential swimming pool must meet
at least one of the following requirements relating to pool
safety features:
(a) The pool must be isolated from access to a home by an
enclosure that meets the pool barrier requirements of s. 515.29;
(b) The pool must be equipped with an approved safety pool
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb117-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 117 2026
cover;
(c) All doors and windows providing direct access from the
home to the pool must be equipped with an exit alarm that has a
minimum sound pressure rating of 85 dB A at 10 feet;
(d) All doors providing direct access from the home to the
pool must be equipped with a self-closing, self-latching device
with a release mechanism placed no lower than 54 inches above
the floor; or
(e) A swimming pool alarm that, when placed in a pool,
sounds an alarm upon detection of an accidental or unauthorized
entrance into the water. Such pool alarm must meet and be
independently certified to ASTM Standard F2208, titled "Standard
Safety Specification for Residential Pool Alarms," which
includes surface motion, pressure, sonar, laser, and infrared
alarms. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "swimming pool
alarm" does not include any swimming protection alarm device
designed for individual use, such as an alarm attached to a
child that sounds when the child exceeds a certain distance or
becomes submerged in water.
(2) A swimming pool, regardless of the year in which the
pool was built, located on residential real property that is
transferred or sold on or after October 1, 2026, must be
equipped with at least one pool safety feature as required in
subsection (1). A home inspector licensed under s. 468.8314 must
report a violation of this subsection to a local enforcement
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb117-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 117 2026
agency as defined in s. 553.71. If the inspected pool safety
feature is the pool barrier, it must meet all of the
requirements in s. 515.29.
(3)(2) A person who fails to equip a new residential
swimming pool with at least one pool safety feature as required
in subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the
second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
775.083, except that no penalty shall be imposed if the person,
within 45 days after arrest or issuance of a summons or a notice
to appear, has equipped the pool with at least one safety
feature as required in subsection (1) or subsection (2) and has
attended a drowning prevention education program established by
s. 515.31. However, the requirement of attending a drowning
prevention education program is waived if such program is not
offered within 45 days after issuance of the citation.
Section 2. Subsection (1) of section 515.31, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
515.31 Drowning prevention education program; public
information publication.—
(1) The department shall develop a drowning prevention
education program. Such program must, which shall be made
available to the public at the state and local levels and is
which shall be required as set forth in s. 515.27(3) s.
515.27(2) for persons in violation of the pool safety
requirements of this chapter. The department may charge a fee,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb117-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 117 2026
not to exceed $100, for attendance at such a program. The
drowning prevention education program is to shall be funded
using fee proceeds, state funds appropriated for such purpose,
and grants. The department, in lieu of developing its own
program, may adopt a nationally recognized drowning prevention
education program to be approved for use in local safety
education programs, as provided in rule of the department.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb117-00